Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 5401.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Director” means the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation.

“Establishment” means any place of business that:
(2) (A) “Establishment” means any place of business that:

offers the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork or where the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork is conducted on the premises of the business; or

represents itself to the public by any title or description of services incorporating the words “touch professional,” “bodywork,” “massage,” “massage therapy,” “massage therapist,” “massage practitioner,” “massagist,” “masseur,” “masseuse,” “energy work,” or other words identified by the Director in rules.

A “place of business” includes any office, clinic, facility, salon, spa, or other location not otherwise exempted under section 5404 of this chapter where a person or persons engage in the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork.

“Practice of massage” and “practice of bodywork” mean offering or engaging in massage or bodywork in exchange for consideration.

“Massage” and “Bodywork” mean systems of structured touch that are:
(4) (A) “Massage” and “Bodywork” mean systems of structured touch that are:

applied to the superficial, soft or deep tissue, muscle, or connective tissue of another person by manual means, including friction, gliding, rocking, tapping, kneading, and nonspecific stretching; or

(II)

designed to affect the energy fields of the body for the purpose of promoting and maintaining health and well-being; and

provided to clients in a manner in which the clients have a reasonable expectation of privacy.

Massage and bodywork may include the use of therapies such as heliotherapy or hydrotherapy; the use of moist, hot, and cold external applications; and the use of oils or other lubricants.

Neither massage nor bodywork include the diagnosis of illness, disease, impairment, or disability.

“Massage therapist, bodyworker, or touch professional” means a person who holds a registration from the Office to practice massage or practice bodywork or both.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. April 1, 2021.

§ 5402.
Prohibitions.

An individual shall not engage in or offer the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork unless the individual is registered with the Office.

It shall be a violation of this chapter for any individual to engage in the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork, or to offer to engage in the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork, if the individual’s registration has been suspended or revoked.

An individual shall not use in connection with the individual’s name any letters, words, titles, or insignia indicating or implying that the individual is offering or engaging in the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork, including the terms “massage therapist,” “bodyworker,” or “touch professional,” unless the individual holds a registration in accordance with this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. April 1, 2021.

§ 5403.
Unauthorized practice.

Any individual who engages in the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork without a registration from the Office shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127

(unauthorized practice).

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. April 1, 2021.

§ 5404.
Exemptions.

The following shall not require a registration under this chapter:

the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork by a student as part of a professional massage or bodywork education program;

the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork by an apprentice as part of a massage or bodywork apprenticeship; or

the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork provided to clients in a manner in which the clients do not have a reasonable expectation of privacy.

The provisions of this chapter requiring individuals to be registered shall not apply to individuals who engage in or offer the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork in the course of their customary duties as physicians, podiatrists, physician assistants, nurses, including advanced practice registered nurses, osteopaths, acupuncturists, athletic trainers, barbers, cosmetologists, estheticians, electrologists, chiropractors, midwives, naturopathic physicians, occupational therapists, physical therapists, or respiratory care practitioners.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a massage therapist, bodyworker, or touch professional from engaging in or offering the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork at a location that is not an establishment, so long as prior to engaging in that practice at that location, the registrant and his or her client agree that the location is acceptable.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. April 1, 2021.